Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.645.040

Certified copy of decision to county assessor when school district boundaries changed.

In cases of appeal resulting in the change of any school district boundaries the decision shall within five days thereafter be also certified by the proper officer to the county assessor of the county, or to the county assessors of the counties, wherein the territory may lie.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.88.090. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 364 s 8; RRS s 5071. Formerly RCW 28A.88.090, 28.88.090.]